de: Stielglasdesign: Stiellos; Stiel; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Дизайн на чаши със столче: Без стебло; Със високо столче; Друго
ko: 스템 유리잔 형태: 스템 없음; 스팀형; 기타
ru: Дизайн бокала: Без ножки; На ножке; Другой
th: การออกแบบเครื่องแก้วมีก้าน: ไม่มีก้าน; มีขาส่วนก้าน; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Design da taça: Sem haste; Com haste; Outro
cs: Design sklenic: Bez stopky; Se stopkou; Jiné
es: Diseño de las copas: Sin tallo; De tallo; Otros
tr: Kadeh takımı tasarımı: Ayaksız; Ayaklı; Diğer
nb: Design av drikkeglass med stett: Uten stilk; Stilket; Annet
ja: 脚付きグラスのデザイン: ステムなし; ステム付き; その他
sl-SI: Oblika kozarca: Brez peclja; Steblo; Druga
it: Design del bicchiere da vino: Senza gambo; Con gambo; Altro
pt-PT: Design do pé: Sem haste; Com haste; Outro
zh-CN: 高脚杯设计: 无脚杯; 带脚; 其他
vi: Thiết kế đồ dùng có chân: Không chân; Có chân; Khác
fr: Conception du verre à pied: Sans tige; À pied; Autre
hu: Talpas pohár kialakítása: Nyél nélküli; Talppal; Egyéb
hr-HR: Dizajn čaša sa stalcima: Bez drške; S drškom; Ostalo
el: Σχεδιασμός ποτηριών με πόδι: Χωρίς πόδι; Στέλεχος; Άλλο
sv: Design på stjälkglas: Utan stjälk; Stjälkad; Annat
sk-SK: Dizajn pohárov: Bez stopky; So stopkou; Iné
zh-TW: 高腳杯設計: 無柄; 有高腳; 其他
fi: Jalallisen lasin muotoilu: Varreton; Varrellinen; Muu
lt-LT: Taurių su kojele dizainas: Be kotelio; Stiebas; Kita
da: Glasdesign: Uden stilk; Stilket; Andet
ro-RO: Designul paharelor: Fără picior; Cu picior; Altele
nl: Ontwerp van wijnglazen: Zonder steel; Met steel; Overig
pl: Konstrukcja kieliszków: Bez nóżki; Na nóżce; Inne
en: Stemware design: Stemless; Stemmed; Other